Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.112.020

Availability of institutions' policies, procedures, and resources.

(1) Institutions of higher education shall make information available on an annual basis to all current and prospective students and employees regarding the institution's policy and procedures, the responsible employee to receive complaints, and compliance with campus sexual violence confidentiality and reporting requirements set forth in 34 C.F.R. Sec. 668.46(b)(11)(iii).

(2) Institutions of higher education shall make the resources in subsection (1) of this section and other information and support available on a confidential basis to all campus sexual assault survivors, regardless of whether the survivor chooses to proceed with a formal report of sexual assault.

[ 2015 c 92 s 3.]